Washington statutes.
RCW 43.180.070

Housing finance plan.

The commission shall adopt a general plan of housing finance objectives to be implemented by the commission during the period of the plan. The commission may exercise the powers authorized under this chapter prior to the adoption of the initial plan. In developing the plan, the commission shall consider and set objectives for:

(1) The use of funds for single-family and multifamily housing;

(2) The use of funds for new construction, rehabilitation, including refinancing of existing debt, and home purchases;

(3) The housing needs of low-income and moderate-income persons and families, and of elderly or persons with disabilities;

(4) The use of funds in coordination with federal, state, and local housing programs for low-income persons;

(5) The use of funds in urban, rural, suburban, and special areas of the state;

(6) The use of financing assistance to stabilize and upgrade declining urban neighborhoods;

(7) The use of financing assistance for economically depressed areas, areas of minority concentration, reservations, and in mortgage-deficient areas;

(8) The geographical distribution of bond proceeds so that the benefits of the housing programs provided under this chapter will be available to address demand on a fair basis throughout the state;

(9) The use of financing assistance for implementation of cost-effective energy efficiency measures in dwellings.

The plan shall include an estimate of the amount of bonds the commission will issue during the term of the plan and how bond proceeds will be expended.

The plan shall be adopted by resolution of the commission following at least one public hearing thereon, notice of which shall be made by mailing to the clerk of the governing body of each county and by publication in the Washington State Register no more than forty and no less than twenty days prior to the hearing. A draft of the plan shall be made available not less than thirty days prior to any such public hearing. At least every two years, the commission shall report to the legislature regarding implementation of the plan.

The commission may periodically update the plan.

The commission shall adopt rules designed to result in the use of bond proceeds in a manner consistent with the plan. The commission may periodically update its rules.

This section is designed to deal only with the use of bond proceeds and nothing in this section shall be construed as a limitation on the commission's authority to issue bonds.

[ 2020 c 274 s 25. Prior: 1999 c 372 s 11; 1999 c 131 s 1; 1983 c 161 s 7.]